Utah statutes.
30-1-17.   Action to determine validity of marriage -- Judgment of validity
or annulment.
When there is doubt as to the validity of a marriage, either party may, in a
court of equity in a county where either party is domiciled, demand its
avoidance or affirmance, but when one of the parties was under the age of
consent at the time of the marriage, the other party, being of proper age,
shall have no such proceeding for that cause against the party under age. The
judgment in the action shall either declare the marriage valid or annulled and
shall be conclusive upon all persons concerned with the marriage.
